Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 1 General Provisions

32-3-1.
Authority to acquire property for present or future public road or other transportation purposes.

Any property may be acquired in fee simple or in any lesser interest, including scenic easements, airspace, and rights of access, by a state agency or a county or municipality through gift, devise, exchange, purchase, prescription, dedication, eminent domain, or any other manner provided by law for present or future public road or other transportation purposes.

Public road purposes shall include rights of way; detours; bridges; bridge approaches; ferries; ferry landings; overpasses; underpasses; viaducts; tunnels; fringe parking facilities; borrow pits; offices; shops; depots; storage yards; buildings and other necessary physical facilities of all types; roadside parks and recreational areas; the growth of trees and shrubbery along rights of way; scenic easements; construction for drainage, maintenance, safety, or esthetic purposes; the elimination of encroachments, private or public crossings, or intersections; the establishment of limited-access public roads; the relocation of utilities; and any and all other purposes which may be reasonably related to the development, growth, or enhancement of the public roads of Georgia.

Property or interests shall not be acquired for “future public road purposes,” as that term is used in this Code section, unless:

Construction will be commenced on the property to be acquired within a period of not less than two years nor more than ten years following the end of the fiscal year in which the secretary of transportation of the United States approves an advance of all the necessary funds to the department for the acquisition of rights of way for such construction under authority of Title 23, Section 108, United States Code, as amended; or

The intended acquisition is part of a specific plan of highway development, and the acquisition will assist in accomplishing one or more of the following:

A substantial monetary savings;

The enhancement of the integration of highways with public or private urban redevelopment; or

The forestalling of the physical or functional obsolescence of highways.

In the process of acquiring property or interests for any public road purpose, an entire lot, block, or tract of land may be acquired if by so doing the interest of the public will be best served.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-601, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 878, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 2020, p. 371, § 4/HB 1098.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, substituted “or” for “and” at the end of paragraph (c)(1).

Cross references.

Municipal street improvements, T. 36, C. 39.

Easements generally, T. 44, C. 9.

Law reviews.

For comment on Southern Ry. v. State Hwy. Dep’t.,

219 Ga. 435

,

134 S.E.2d 12

(1963), see 1 Ga. St. B. J. 242 (1964).

For article surveying real property law in 1984-1985, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 343 (1985).

32-3-2.
Acquisition procedure generally; recording order and judgment or instrument of conveyance; filing order and judgment or instrument in records of department.

All acquisition of property or interests for public road and other transportation purposes shall proceed under the methods set out in this article and in Title 22. Any instrument which conveys such property or interest to or any order and judgment which vests such property or interest in a state agency, county, or municipality shall be recorded in the name of the agency, county, or municipality in each county wherein the property or interest may lie, notwithstanding Code Section 50-16-3. In the case of property or interests acquired by the department, the instrument or order and judgment shall also be kept in the records of the department. Article 1 of Chapter 6 of Title 48 shall not apply to property or interests acquired under the authority of this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-602, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment on Southern Ry. v. State Hwy. Dep’t,

219 Ga. 435

,

134 S.E.2d 12

(1963), see 1 Ga. St. B. J. 242 (1964).

32-3-3.
Acquisition of property by devise, exchange, prescription, or dedication; acquisition by county or municipality on behalf of department.

The department or any county or municipality is authorized to accept donations, transfers, or devises of land from private persons, from the federal government, or from other state agencies, counties, or municipalities, provided that such land is suitable for present or future public road purposes. Any property may be so acquired in fee or any lesser interest, provided that the state agency, county, or municipality thereby obtains an interest sufficient to ensure reasonable protection of the public investment which it may thereafter make in such land. The instrument which conveys such property or interest shall be recorded in the county or counties where such property or interest lies and, in the case of property or interests acquired by the department, shall also be kept in the records of the department.

Any state agency, county, or municipality is authorized, for public road purposes, to enter into agreements with other state agencies, counties, or municipalities, with the federal government, and with private persons for the exchange of real property or interests therein for public road purposes. Such exchange shall not be consummated unless the exchange serves the best interest of the public and unless the property or interest to be acquired in exchange is appraised as being of equal value to, or of greater value than, the property or interest to be exchanged.

Notwithstanding Code Section 44-5-163, any state agency, county, or municipality is authorized to acquire by prescription and to incorporate into its system of public roads any road on private land which has come to be a public road by the exercise of unlimited public use for the preceding seven years or more.

Any state agency, county, or municipality may acquire rights of way or other real property or interests therein by dedication, provided that the property or interests are adequate for public road purposes and serve the best interests of the public; provided, further, that the agency, county, or municipality receives a warranty deed, except where the property or interest is acquired from a state or federal agency, a county, or a municipality, in which case, where legally possible, a warranty deed shall be received; but, if it is not legally possible to receive a warranty deed, then a quitclaim deed shall be received.

When a road is approved as part of the state highway system, it shall be the duty of the county or municipality through which the road will pass to assist the department in procuring the necessary rights of way as economically as possible; and all expenses thereof shall be paid as provided in Code Section 32-5-25, provided that, whenever the county or municipality acquires property or interests for the department, title to such property or interest may be acquired in the name of the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-602, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

32-3-3.1.
Relocation or reconstruction of outdoor advertising sign; requirements.

When rights of way or real property or interests therein are acquired by a state agency, county, or municipality for public road purposes and an outdoor advertising sign permitted by the state in accordance with Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 6 of this title and a local county or municipal ordinance, which has not lapsed and is in good standing, is located upon such property, the outdoor advertising sign may be relocated or reconstructed and relocated through agreement of the owner of the property and owner of the outdoor advertising sign, if such owners do not refer to the same person, so long as the new location:

Is within 250 feet of its original location, provided that the new location meets the requirements for an outdoor advertising sign provided in Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 6 of this title;

Is available to the owner of the outdoor advertising sign and is comparable to the original location, as agreed upon by the owner of the outdoor advertising sign and the department;

Does not result in a violation of federal or state law; and

Is within zoned commercial or industrial areas or unzoned commercial or industrial areas as defined in Code Section 32-6-71.

An outdoor advertising sign relocated as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, or the visibility of which is otherwise obstructed by the construction of a sound wall, noise barrier, or other transportation related improvement, may be adjusted in height or angle or both in order to restore the visibility of the sign to the same or a comparable visibility which existed prior to acquisition by a state agency, county, or municipality, provided that the height of such relocated sign shall not exceed the greater of the height of the existing sign or 75 feet, as measured from the base of the sign or the crown of the adjacent roadway to which the sign is permitted, whichever is greater.

For any federal aid project or any project financed in whole or in part with federal funds, the actual costs of relocation or reconstruction and relocation of an outdoor advertising sign relocated as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be paid by the department. For any project not financed in whole or in part with federal funds, the actual costs of relocation or reconstruction and relocation shall be paid by the owner of the outdoor advertising sign.

If no relocation site that meets the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section exists, just and adequate compensation shall be paid by the department to the owner of the outdoor advertising sign.

If a sign is eligible to be relocated as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, or the visibility of which is otherwise obstructed by the construction of a sound wall, noise barrier, or other transportation related improvement, but such new location would result in a conflict with local ordinances in the city or county of applicable jurisdiction and no variance or other exception is granted to allow relocation as requested by the owner of the outdoor advertising sign, just and adequate compensation shall be paid by the local governing authority to the owner of the outdoor advertising sign. However, no compensation resulting from the denial of a variance or exception by a local governing authority for an outdoor advertising sign eligible for relocation under this Code section shall be paid either directly or indirectly by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-3-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1072, § 5/SB 169; Ga. L. 2020, p. 371, § 5/HB 1098.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, inserted “, or the visibility of which is otherwise obstructed by the construction of a sound wall, noise barrier, or other transportation related improvement,” in subsections (b) and (e).

32-3-3.2.
Procedure when documented conflict.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Acquisition” means the acquisition of rights of way or right of way easements in lieu of condemnation.

“Condemnation” means condemnation of rights of way or right of way easements pursuant to this title.

“Documentation of a conflict” means documentation produced by a condemning authority to a property owner revealing a proposed cure for an alleged damage that resulted as part of a condemnation or from acquisition through negotiations, of which the cure proposed to the property owner by the condemning authority would result in a violation of a local government land use ordinance or land disturbance regulation.

When rights of way or real property or interests therein are acquired or condemned by a state agency, county, or municipality for public road purposes and a documentation of a conflict has been issued to a property owner, the local jurisdiction shall:

Grant a minimum degree of variance from land use or land disturbance permitting standards for the remaining parcel to the property owner or any successor in interest. Such variance shall be granted upon satisfactory production of proof of the transfer of title of the acquired or condemned property or interests in property to the condemning authority and the documentation of a conflict; provided, however, that application for any such variance has been made no later than five years after the transfer of property or interests in property; or

Provide to the property owner or any successor in interest just and adequate compensation for damages related to a conflict with local land use ordinances or regulations as identified by documentation of a conflict and upon denial of a variance sought pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection; provided, however, that no compensation shall be paid either directly or indirectly by the acquirer or condemnor.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-3-3.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 371, § 6/HB 1098.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 29, 2020.

32-3-4.
Authority to bring condemnation proceedings.

Whenever any state agency, county, or municipality desires to take or damage private property, including scenic easements, air rights, rights of access, and other interests in land for public road purposes or for any other public transportation purposes and shall find or believe, concerning which the decision of the condemning authority shall be final and conclusive, that the title of the apparent or presumptive owner of such property is defective, doubtful, incomplete, or in controversy, or that there are or may be unknown persons or nonresidents who have or may have some claim or demand thereon or some actual or contingent interest or estate therein, or that there are minors or persons under disability who are or may be interested therein, or that there are taxes due or that should be paid thereon, or shall for any reason conclude that it is desirable to have a judicial ascertainment of any question connected with the matter, such state agency, county, or municipality, through any authorized representative, may file a proceeding in rem in the superior court of the county having jurisdiction condemning the property or interests to the use of the petitioner upon payment of just and adequate compensation therefor to the person or persons entitled to such payment.

When the acquisition of public property or an interest therein is necessary for public road purposes, including limited-access roads provided for by Article 4 of Chapter 6 of this title, the department may acquire such public property or interest therein by condemnation and the power of eminent domain when such acquisition is approved by the State Commission on the Condemnation of Public Property as provided in Code Section 50-16-183. The procedures for the condemnation of property provided for in this Code section and Code Sections 32-3-5 through 32-3-19 of this article and the procedures provided for the condemnation of property in Article 3 of Chapter 2 of Title 22 and the procedures provided for the condemnation of property in Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 22 when the property sought is a public cemetery shall apply to the condemnation of public property or an interest therein by the department. As used in this subsection, the term “public property” has the meaning provided for in Code Section 50-16-180.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-603, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 973, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1187, § 4.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

For article, “Condemning Local Government Condemnation,” see 39 Mercer L. Rev. 11 (1987).

For annual survey on real property law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2009).

32-3-5.
Contents of condemnation petition; notice.

The petition referred to in Code Section 32-3-4 shall set forth:

The facts showing the right to condemn;

The property or interests to be taken or damaged;

The names and residences of the persons whose property or interests are to be taken or otherwise affected, so far as known;

Descriptions of the persons or classes of unknown persons whose rights therein are to be excluded or otherwise affected;

Such other facts as are necessary for a full understanding of the cause;

A prayer for the judgment of the court in accordance with Code Section 32-3-13 or 32-3-19; and

The date of the approval of the original location of the highway.

If any of the persons referred to in the petition are, so far as may be known, minors or under disability, that fact shall be stated.

It shall be the duty of the condemning authority, within 30 days from the date of the original approval and designation of said location as a highway, to cause the location of said highway in said county to be advertised once each week for four consecutive weeks in the newspaper of the county in which the sheriff’s advertisements are carried; and said advertisement shall designate the land lots or land districts of said county through which such highway will be located. Said advertisement shall further show the date of the original location of such highway as provided for in this subsection. Said advertisement shall further state that a plat or map of the project showing the exact date of the original location is on file at the office of the Department of Transportation and that any interested party may obtain a copy of same by writing to the Department of Transportation and paying a nominal cost therefor.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-604, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 10.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to eminent domain, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1998).

For annual survey on real property law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2009).

32-3-6.
Declaration of taking; Order of condemnation by condemning authority.

In addition to the petition filed pursuant to Code Section 32-3-4, the petitioner shall also file with the court a declaration of taking signed by:

The commissioner or the deputy commissioner of the Department of Transportation if the petitioner is seeking to acquire property or interests on behalf of the department;

The county governing authority if the petitioner is seeking to condemn for county road system purposes or any other public transportation purpose; or

The municipal governing authority if the petitioner is seeking to condemn for municipal street system purposes or any other public transportation purpose.

The declaration of taking shall declare that the lands are being taken for the use of the condemnor, subject to the order of the court provided for in Code Section 32-3-12. The declaration shall contain or have annexed thereto:

A statement of the authority under which, and the public use for which, such lands are taken;

A description of the lands taken sufficient for the identification thereof;

A statement of the estate or interest in the lands taken for public use;

A plat showing the lands taken;

A statement of the sum of money estimated by the condemning authority to be just compensation for the land taken, including consequential damages to land not taken, accompanied by a sworn copy as an exhibit of the appraiser’s statement justifying the sum; and

A certified copy of an order by the commissioner if the property or interest is being condemned for the department or by the county or municipality if the property or interest is being condemned for a county or municipality, finding that the circumstances are such that it is necessary to proceed in the particular case under this article, and specifically authorizing condemnation under this article.

Such an order of the commissioner or governing authority shall be conclusive as to the use of the property or interest condemned and as to the authority of the commissioner or governing authority to condemn under this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-605, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 15; Ga. L. 1975, p. 813, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 973, § 5.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on real property law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2009).

32-3-7.
Deposit of estimated compensation; vesting of title in condemning authority; protection of due process rights.

Upon the filing of the declaration of taking and the deposit into court, which deposit shall be made at the time the declaration of taking is filed to the use of the persons entitled thereto, of the sum of money estimated in the declaration by the condemning authority to be just compensation, title to the property in fee simple absolute or such lesser interest as is specified in the declaration shall vest in the condemnor; the land shall be deemed to be condemned and taken for the use of the condemnor; and the right to just compensation for the same shall vest in the persons entitled thereto.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to deprive the owner of the property or interest of due process of law as guaranteed by the Constitutions of Georgia and of the United States.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-605, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

32-3-8.
Service of process in condemnation proceedings generally.

Upon the filing of the petition and declaration, where the owner or owners of the property sought to be condemned or any person having a claim against or interest in the same are residents of this state, the petition and declaration shall be served upon such persons personally. In cases where such persons are residents of this state but not of the county in which such property or interest is located, such service shall be by second original, as in other cases.

If the owner, or any of the owners, or any person having a claim against or interest in the property is a minor or under any disability whatsoever, such notice shall be served:

Upon his or her guardian; and, if such guardian is a nonresident of this state, upon the judge of the probate court of the county in which the property or interest is located, who shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent such minors or persons under disability in the litigation, provided that, if the nonresident guardian intervenes, he or she shall serve in lieu of the guardian ad litem; or

If there is no guardian, personally upon the minor, where such minor is a resident of this state. If such minor is not a resident of the county where the property or interest is located, service shall be by second original, as is provided by law in other cases, and upon the judge of the probate court of the county where the property or interest is located, who shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the minor in the litigation.

In subsection (b) of this Code section, if the judge of the probate court is disqualified, for reason of interest or other cause, notice shall be served upon the clerk of the superior court of the county, who shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the minor or person under disability.

If the property or interest sought to be condemned is held in trust or if the condemnation is directed toward property in which remainders have been created, notice shall be served upon the trustee and also upon such persons as have an interest under the conveyance and who are of age, provided that, where any of the persons to be served are not residents of the county, such service shall be by second original, as in other cases.

A copy of the petition and declaration shall be served upon the tax collecting authority of any county or municipality in which the property or interest may be located, who shall make known in writing the taxes due on the property or interest; and the court shall give such direction as will satisfy the same and discharge the lien thereon.

In all instances, and in addition to the service provided for in this Code section, the condemnor shall, at the time of filing the petition and declaration of taking, cause a copy of such proceedings to be posted on the bulletin board at the courthouse. In addition thereto, such advertisement shall be published in the official newspaper of the county in which the property or interest is located, which notice shall describe the property or interest taken so as to identify the same and shall give the name or names of the owner or owners of such property or interest or persons having claims against such property or interest so far as the same may be known. Such notice shall be published in such newspaper once each week for two weeks subsequent to the filing of such petition and declaration.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-606, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 7.1.

Cross references.

Service of process generally, §

9-11-4

.

32-3-9.
Service of nonresidents in condemnation proceedings.

If a nonresident of this state owns the property condemned or any interest therein, whether such interest is as the owner of the fee or some lesser interest, or any easement, or as a guardian for a minor or a person non compos mentis, or as a trustee, or growing out of similar facts, such nonresident, in the event that his or her address is known, shall be served with a true and correct copy of the petition and declaration, together with any orders of the court thereon. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the superior court for the county wherein such condemnation proceeding is pending to enclose a copy of the petition and declaration in an envelope, properly addressed to the nonresident at his or her last known address, and to deposit the same in the United States mail, properly registered or certified and with a return receipt requested, or deliver the same by statutory overnight delivery; and the clerk shall make a return service, showing these facts, upon the original petition and declaration in such matter for which he or she shall be paid the fee he or she receives for like service for each service made, the same to be taxed against the costs in the case. Such certificate of service shall be final and conclusive as to service of the petition upon the nonresident and shall become a part of the record in the matter.

Where the address of the nonresident is unknown, whether such nonresident is the owner of the property, a minor, or the trustee or guardian of such minor or has any other lawful interest in the property, the method of advertising the condemnation of the particular property, as provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 32-3-5, shall be sufficient service upon such nonresidents and shall be final and conclusive; provided, however, that, in that event, it shall be the duty of the condemnor, in filing the petition for condemnation, to certify that the address of such person or persons is unknown to the condemnor; provided, further, that it shall be the duty of the sheriff of the county wherein the condemnation is pending to inquire into the truth of such allegation and to enter a certificate upon the condemnation proceeding, within three days from the filing of the same, verifying the truth of the allegation. This certificate, together with the method of advertising of such condemnation proceedings provided for in the laws and statutes described above, shall be final and conclusive as to lawful service of the petition for condemnation upon the nonresident. For each such certificate, the sheriff shall receive the fee the sheriff receives for like service for each such certificate, the same to be taxed as other costs in the case.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-606, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 11; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to eminent domain, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1998).

32-3-10.
Substantial compliance with Code Sections 32-3-8 and 32-3-9.

The proceeding described in this article being in rem, no provision in Code Sections 32-3-8 and 32-3-9 as to service shall be so construed as to invalidate the intent of the condemnor or as to delay the taking of the property or interest described in the declaration of taking and in the petition or in any manner as to delay the progress of the work for which the taking was made; and a substantial compliance with the provisions for service as heretofore set out in this article shall be deemed sufficient.

At any stage of the cause before final verdict and judgment, the judge of the superior court may order such additional service to be made or such additional parties to be named as may be required by equity and justice; but this shall not be so construed as to invalidate the taking or delay the progress of the work.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-606, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-3-11.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Power of judge to set aside, vacate, and annul declaration of taking; issuance and service on condemnor of rule nisi; hearing.

Upon proper pleadings and evidence, under the applicable rules of law, the judge of the superior court shall have the authority to set aside, vacate, and annul the declaration of taking, together with any title acquired thereby, in the same way and manner and for the same reasons as are provided by Code Sections 23-2-60 and 9-11-60. The power of the court in this respect shall not be construed as extending to a determination of questions of necessity, but there shall be a prima-facie presumption that the property or interest condemned is taken for and is necessary to the public use provided for in this article.

The power of the court as described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be restricted to the following questions:

Fraud or bad faith, as contemplated by Code Sections 23-2-60 and 9-11-60;

The improper use of the powers of this article, such as are not contemplated by this article;

The abuse or misuse of the powers of this article; and

Such other questions as may properly be raised, including the question of whether or not this article has been invoked in some respect beyond the privileges conferred by this article or by an unauthorized agency, county, or municipality.

If the condemnee desires to raise such questions as are outlined in subsection (b) of this Code section, the same shall be done by proper pleadings, in the form of a petition addressed to the judge of the superior court having jurisdiction thereof, filed in the same proceedings not later than 30 days subsequent to the date of service upon the condemnee of the declaration of taking. The presiding judge shall thereupon cause a rule nisi to be issued and served upon the condemnor, requiring him to show cause at a time and place designated by the judge why the title acquired by the declaration of taking should not be vacated and set aside in the same way and manner as is now provided for setting aside deeds acquired by fraud. Such hearing shall be had not earlier than 15 days from the time of service of the rule nisi upon the condemnor, nor later than 60 days from the date of filing of the declaration of taking, and with the right of appeal by either party, as in other cases.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-607, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 32-3-11 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005).

For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 477 (2006).

For annual survey on real property, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 255 (2012).

For annual survey on real property, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2017).

32-3-11.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Power of judge to set aside, vacate, and annul declaration of taking; issuance and service on condemnor of rule nisi; hearing.

Upon proper pleadings and evidence, under the applicable rules of law, the judge of the superior court shall have the authority to set aside, vacate, and annul the declaration of taking, together with any title acquired thereby, in the same way and manner and for the same reasons as are provided by Code Sections 23-2-60 and 9-11-60. The power of the court in this respect shall not be construed as extending to a determination of questions of necessity, but there shall be a prima-facie presumption that the property or interest condemned is taken for and is necessary to the public use provided for in this article.

The power of the court as described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be restricted to the following questions:

Fraud or bad faith, as contemplated by Code Sections 23-2-60 and 9-11-60;

The improper use of the powers of this article, such as are not contemplated by this article;

The abuse or misuse of the powers of this article; and

Such other questions as may properly be raised, including the question of whether or not this article has been invoked in some respect beyond the privileges conferred by this article or by an unauthorized agency, county, or municipality.

If the condemnee desires to raise such questions as are outlined in subsection (b) of this Code section, the same shall be done by proper pleadings, in the form of a petition for review addressed to the judge of the superior court having jurisdiction thereof, filed in the same proceedings not later than 30 days subsequent to the date of service upon the condemnee of the declaration of taking. The presiding judge shall thereupon cause a rule nisi to be issued and served upon the condemnor, requiring him or her to show cause at a time and place designated by the judge why the title acquired by the declaration of taking should not be vacated and set aside in the same way and manner as is now provided for setting aside deeds acquired by fraud. Such hearing shall be had not earlier than 15 days from the time of service of the rule nisi upon the condemnor, nor later than 60 days from the date of filing of the declaration of taking, and with the right of appeal by either party, as in other cases. A petition for review filed pursuant to this subsection shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 3 of Title 5, except to the extent any such provision is in conflict with any provision of this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-607, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-17/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 32-3-11 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, in subsection (c), inserted “for review” in the first sentence, inserted “or her” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.

32-3-12.
Orders of court for payment of award in condemnation proceedings, for surrender of property, and as to other charges.

Upon the application of the parties in interest, and not earlier than 15 days subsequent to the date of the last advertisement in the official newspaper of the county as provided for in subsection (f) of Code Section 32-3-8, the court shall order that the money deposited in the court, or any part thereof applied for, be paid forthwith to the parties found to be entitled thereto, for the just compensation to be awarded in the proceedings; provided, however, that, where the validity of the proceedings has been placed in issue as provided for in Code Section 32-3-11, the court shall not order the payment of the fund to the condemnee pending a final determination of such questions.

Upon the filing of a declaration of taking, the court shall have power to fix the time, the same to be not later than 60 days from the date of the filing of the declaration of taking as provided in Code Section 32-3-6, within which and the terms upon which the parties in possession shall be required to surrender possession to the petitioner. The court shall have power to make such orders in respect of encumbrances, liens, rents, taxes, assessments, insurance, and other charges, if any, as shall be just and equitable.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-608, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-3-13.
Self-executing nature of declaration of taking; court costs; entry of judgment; transfer of case to closed docket; effect of Code section on condemnor’s title.

No judgment of any court and no order or ruling of the judge thereof shall be necessary to give effect to the declaration of taking provided for in Code Section 32-3-6; but the same shall be self-executing, subject, however, to the power of the court as provided for in Code Section 32-3-11.

If no appeal is filed as provided for in Code Section 32-3-14, the condemnor shall, at the next term of the superior court convening not earlier than 30 days subsequent to the date of service, as provided for in Code Sections 32-3-8 and 32-3-9, or at any time thereafter, pay all accrued court costs in the case to the clerk of the superior court in which the same is pending, at which time the judge of the superior court shall enter judgment in favor of the condemnee and against the condemnor for the sum of money deposited by the condemnor with the declaration of taking. If such sum has been withdrawn from the court by the condemnee as provided for in Code Section 32-3-12, the clerk of the superior court shall mark such judgment satisfied; and if the condemnee has not withdrawn such sum the clerk shall immediately apply the same to the payment of the judgment and either transmit the same to the condemnee or cause the condemnee to be notified that he, the clerk, holds the same subject to the demand of the condemnee.

In any event, the case shall be transferred, under the conditions set out in this Code section, to the closed docket.

Nothing provided for in this Code section shall be construed as in any way affecting the title acquired by the condemnor by virtue of the declaration of taking, as provided for in Code Section 32-3-7.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-609, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-3-14.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Filing notice of appeal.

If the owner, or any of the owners, or any person having a claim against or interest in the property is dissatisfied with the amount of compensation as estimated in the declaration of taking and deposited in court, as provided for in Code Section 32-3-7, such person or persons, or any of them, shall have the right, at any time subsequent to the filing of the declaration and the deposit of the fund into court, but not later than 30 days following the date of the service as provided for in Code Sections 32-3-8 and 32-3-9, to file with the court a notice of appeal, the same to be in writing and made a part of the record in the proceedings.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-610, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 32-3-14 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version

Law reviews.

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 427 (2009).